Georgia, session 2025_26, HB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 11 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to emergency
medical services, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-11-13.
(a) Emergency medical services, including ambulance service, whether provided by a
public, private nonprofit, or private for profit entity, are hereby declared to be essential
services in this state.
(b) This Code section shall not be construed to revise or impact the provision of such
services through local coordinating entities within territorial zones and health districts in
this state. This Code section shall not be construed to grant new or additional authority,
oversight, or regulatory power to any state agency or local government of this state."
H. B. 209
- 1 -

LC 46 1035
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 209
- 2 -